Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-624.01
Special election; candidate filing form; objections; notice; filing officer; duty; court order; effect.

(1) A candidate filing form filed for a special election pursuant to section 32-606.01 shall be deemed to be valid unless objections are made in writing within three business days after the filing deadline. If an objection is made, notice shall be sent in writing to all candidates who may be affected thereby.

(2) The filing officer with whom the candidate filing form was filed shall determine the validity of such objection, and the filing officer's decision shall be final unless an order is made in the matter by a judge of the county court, district court, Court of Appeals, or Supreme Court no later than the fourth Friday before the election. Such order may be made summarily upon application of any interested party and upon such notice as the court may require. The order of the court shall be binding on all filing officers.

Laws 2025, LB521, § 50;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 11.
April 16, 2026